Maryland, session 2025, HB0097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
12–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 97 3
(b) “Authority” means an industrial development authority, REVENUE
AUTHORITY, REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY, OR OTHER SIMILARLY NAMED
AUTHORITY established in accordance with § 12–105 of this subtitle.
(C) “AUTHORITY FUNDS” MEANS:
(1) MONEY MADE AVAILABLE TO THE AUTHORITY UNDER TITLE 12,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) REVENUES, PROCEEDS, EARNINGS, PREMIUMS, FEES, AND ANY
OTHER MONEY PAYABLE TO OR RECEIVED BY THE AUTHORITY FROM THE
OWNERSHIP, USE, SALE, LEASE, OR OTHER DISPOSITION OF PROPERTY OF THE
AUTHORITY OR OTHERWISE IN THE EXERCISE OF ITS POWERS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY MADE AVAILABLE TO THE AUTHORITY.
[(c)] (D) (1) “Bond” means a revenue bond, note, or other instrument,
certificate, or evidence of obligation that is issued and sold by a public body under this
subtitle [to finance a facility or to refund an outstanding bond].
(2) “Bond” includes:
(i) a bond anticipation note; and
(ii) a note in the nature of commercial paper.
[(d)] (E) “Chief executive” means the president, chair, mayor, county executive,
or any other chief executive officer of a public body.
(F) “DEVELOPMENT” INCLUDES NEW DEVELOPMENT, REDEVELOPMENT,
REVITALIZATION, AND RENOVATION.
[(e)] (G) “Facility” means any land or an interest in land, structure, working
capital, equipment, or other property, or any combination of them, the acquisition or
improvement of which the legislative body of a county or municipal corporation, the board
of directors of an authority, or the Maryland Industrial Development Financing Authority,
in its sole discretion, determines by resolution will accomplish one or more of the legislative
purposes listed in § 12–103(b) of this subtitle.
[(f)] (H) “Facility applicant” means a person, public or private corporation, or
other entity, whether for–profit or nonprofit, that, by letter of intent or similar agreement
with a public body, requests the public body to participate in financing a facility under this
subtitle for use by a facility user.

HOUSE BILL 97
[(g)] (I) (1) “Facility user” means a person, public or private corporation, or
other entity, whether for–profit or nonprofit, that owns, leases, or uses all or part of a
facility.
(2) “Facility user” may include a facility applicant.
[(h)] (J) “Finance” includes refinance.
[(i)] (K) (1) “Finance board” means a unit or instrumentality of a county or
municipal corporation that is authorized by statute or charter to issue and sell bonds of the
county or municipal corporation.
(2) “Finance board” does not include the legislative body of a county or
municipal corporation.
[(j)] (L) “Improve” means to add, alter, construct, equip, expand, extend,
improve, install, reconstruct, rehabilitate, remodel, or repair.
[(k)] (M) “Improvement” means addition, alteration, construction, equipping,
expansion, extension, improvement, installation, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
remodeling, or repair.
(N) “PROJECT AREA” MEANS A GEOGRAPHIC AREA DESIGNATED BY THE
LEGISLATIVE BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION WITHIN ITS
JURISDICTION AS A PROJECT AREA UNDER § 12–105(H) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(O) “PROJECT AREA PLAN” MEANS THE PLAN ESTABLISHED BY A COUNTY
OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION FOR THE PROJECT AREA UNDER § 12–105(H) OF THIS
SUBTITLE THAT ACCOMPLISHES AT LEAST ONE OF THE PURPOSES UNDER §
12–103(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(l)] (P) “Public body” means:
(1) a county;
(2) a municipal corporation;
(3) an authority; or
(4) the Maryland Industrial Development Financing Authority.
[(m)] (Q) (1) “Public port” means the public ports and harbors on the
Chesapeake Bay or the Isle of Wight Bay and their tributaries in the State.
(2) “Public port” includes:

HOUSE BILL 97 5
(i) the Baltimore Harbor (the Patapsco River and its tributaries
north and west of North Point and Bodkin Point);
(ii) the Port of Cambridge (the south side of the Choptank River
between Hambrook’s Bar and the Emerson C. Harrington Bridge); and
(iii) the Port of Crisfield (the Little Annemessex River east of James
Island).
12–105.
(a) To accomplish one or more of the legislative purposes listed in § 12–103(b) of
this subtitle, the legislative body of a county or municipal corporation may adopt a
resolution to create an [industrial development] authority in accordance with this subtitle.
(b) A resolution adopted under subsection (a), (f), [or] (g), OR (H) of this section:
(1) is administrative in nature;
(2) is not subject to referendum; and
(3) in a county or municipal corporation that has a publicly elected chief
executive, is subject to approval by the chief executive.
(c) Subsection (a) of this section is self–executing and fully authorizes a county or
municipal corporation to establish an authority, notwithstanding any other statutory or
charter provision.
(d) A resolution adopted under subsection (a) of this section shall include
proposed articles of incorporation of the authority that state:
(1) the name of the authority, which shall be:
(I) “Industrial Development Authority of (name of the incorporating
county or municipal corporation)”;
(II) “REVENUE AUTHORITY OF (NAME OF THE INCORPORATING
COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION)”;
(III) “REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY OF (NAME OF THE
INCORPORATING COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION)”; OR
(IV) A SIMILARLY NAMED ENTITY;
(2) that the authority is formed under this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 97
(3) the names, addresses, and terms of office of the initial members of the
board of directors of the authority;
(4) the address of the principal office of the authority;
(5) the purposes for which the authority is formed; and
(6) the powers of the authority subject to the limitations on the powers of
an authority under this subtitle.
(e) (1) The chief executive of the incorporating county or municipal
corporation, or any other official designated in the resolution establishing the authority,
shall execute and file the articles of incorporation of the authority for record with the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation.
(2) When the State Department of Assessments and Taxation accepts the
articles of incorporation for record, the authority becomes a body politic and corporate and
an instrumentality of the incorporating county or municipal corporation.
(3) Acceptance of the articles of incorporation for record by the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation is conclusive evidence of the formation of the
authority.
(f) (1) By resolution, the legislative body of the incorporating county or
municipal corporation may adopt an amendment to the articles of incorporation of the
authority.
(2) Articles of amendment may contain any provision that lawfully could
be contained in articles of incorporation at the time of the amendment.
(3) The articles of amendment shall be filed for record with the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation.
(4) The articles of amendment are effective as of the time the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation accepts the articles for record.
(5) Acceptance of the articles of amendment for record by the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation is conclusive evidence that the articles have been
lawfully and properly adopted.
(g) (1) Subject to the provisions of this section and any limitations imposed by
law on the impairment of contracts, the incorporating county or municipal corporation, in
its sole discretion, by resolution may:
(i) set or change the NAME, structure, organization, procedures,
programs, or activities of the authority; or

HOUSE BILL 97 7
(ii) terminate the authority.
(2) On termination of an authority:
(i) title to all property of the authority shall be transferred to and
vest in the incorporating county or municipal corporation; and
(ii) all obligations of the authority shall be transferred to and
assumed by the incorporating county or municipal corporation.
(H) THE LEGISLATIVE BODY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
MAY ADOPT A RESOLUTION:
(1) DESIGNATING A GEOGRAPHIC AREA WITHIN ITS JURISDICTION AS
A PROJECT AREA;
(2) ESTABLISHING A PROJECT AREA PLAN FOR A PROJECT AREA; AND
(3) AUTHORIZING THE AUTHORITY TO IMPLEMENT THE PROJECT
AREA PLAN.
12–107.
(a) The board of directors of an authority shall govern the authority.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle or the resolution establishing the
authority, the procedures of the incorporating county or municipal corporation control any
matter relating to the internal administration of the authority.
(C) THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF AN AUTHORITY SHALL PROVIDE FOR THE
MAINTENANCE OF THE AUTHORITY’S MINUTES, RESOLUTIONS, AND OTHER
RECORDS SEPARATE FROM THOSE OF THE INCORPORATING COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION THAT CREATED THE AUTHORITY.
12–108.
Except as OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE OR AS necessary to pay debt
service or implement the public purposes or programs of the incorporating county or
municipal corporation, the net earnings of an authority may benefit only the incorporating
county or municipal corporation and may not benefit any person.
12–109.
(a) (1) Except as limited by its articles of incorporation, an authority has all
the powers set forth in this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 97
(2) (I) [An] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) THROUGH (IV) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, AN authority may:
[(i)] 1. receive money from [its incorporating county or municipal
corporation, the State, other governmental units, or nonprofit organizations] ANY PUBLIC,
PRIVATE, OR NONPROFIT SOURCE TO FUND THE AUTHORITY’S ACTIVITIES, POWERS,
AND DUTIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE;
[(ii)] 2. charge fees for its services;
[(iii)] 3. have employees and consultants as it considers necessary;
[and]
[(iv)] 4. use the services of other governmental units;
5. OWN, HOLD, AND IMPROVE REAL AND PERSONAL
PROPERTY;
6. PURCHASE, HOLD, MAINTAIN, UTILIZE, MANAGE,
LEASE, OBTAIN OPTIONS ON, OR ACQUIRE BY GIFT, GRANT, BEQUEST, DEVISE, OR
OTHERWISE ANY REAL OR PERSONAL PROPERTY WHICH MAY INCLUDE THE USE OF
AUTHORITY FUNDS OR THE COLLECTION OF REVENUE;
7. SELL, LEASE, EXCHANGE, TRANSFER, ASSIGN,
PLEDGE, OR DISPOSE OF ANY REAL OR PERSONAL PROPERTY;
8. ENTER INTO CONTRACTS AND OTHER INSTRUMENTS
NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO EXERCISE THE AUTHORITY’S POWERS;
9. PROVIDE FOR THE DEMOLITION, CONSTRUCTION,
RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, IMPROVEMENT, ALTERATION, OR REPAIR OF
REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY;
10. INSURE OR PROVIDE FOR THE INSURANCE OF REAL
AND PERSONAL PROPERTY OR OPERATIONS OF THE AUTHORITY AGAINST ANY RISKS
OR HAZARDS;
11. SUE AND BE SUED;
12. IF DISPOSING OF OR LEASING LAND, RETAIN
CONTROL OR ESTABLISH RESTRICTIONS AND COVENANTS RUNNING WITH THE LAND
CONSISTENT WITH THE PROJECT AREA PLAN;

HOUSE BILL 97 9
13. ENTER INTO A LEASE AGREEMENT ON REAL OR
PERSONAL PROPERTY, EITHER AS LESSEE OR LESSOR;
14. BORROW MONEY OR ACCEPT FINANCIAL OR OTHER
ASSISTANCE FROM A PUBLIC ENTITY OR ANY OTHER SOURCE FOR ANY OF THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE AND COMPLY WITH ANY CONDITIONS OF ANY LOAN OR
ASSISTANCE;
15. ISSUE BONDS TO FINANCE THE UNDERTAKING OF ANY
PROJECT AREA DEVELOPMENT OR FOR ANY OF THE AUTHORITY’S OTHER PURPOSES,
INCLUDING:
A. REIMBURSING AN ADVANCE MADE BY THE AUTHORITY
OR BY A PUBLIC ENTITY TO THE AUTHORITY;
B. REFUNDING BONDS TO PAY OR RETIRE BONDS
PREVIOUSLY ISSUED BY THE AUTHORITY; AND
C. REFUNDING BONDS TO PAY OR RETIRE BONDS
PREVIOUSLY ISSUED BY THE AUTHORITY OR THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION THAT DESIGNATED THE PROJECT AREA FOR EXPENSES ASSOCIATED
WITH PROJECT AREA DEVELOPMENT;
16. PAY AN IMPACT FEE, EXACTION, OR OTHER FEE IN
CONNECTION WITH LAND DEVELOPMENT IMPOSED BY THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION THAT DESIGNATED THE PROJECT AREA;
17. MAKE LOANS;
18. USE AUTHORITY FUNDS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
19. TRANSACT OTHER BUSINESS AND EXERCISE ALL
OTHER POWERS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) AN AUTHORITY MAY ACQUIRE REAL PROPERTY UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH THAT IS OUTSIDE A PROJECT AREA ONLY
IF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE AUTHORITY DETERMINES THAT THE
PROPERTY WILL BENEFIT A PROJECT AREA.
(III) AUTHORITY FUNDS SHALL BE ACCOUNTED FOR
SEPARATELY FROM THE FUNDS OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT
CREATED THE AUTHORITY.

HOUSE BILL 97
(IV) AN AUTHORITY MAY ACCUMULATE AUTHORITY FUNDS,
RETAINED EARNINGS, OR FUND BALANCES IN ANY FUND.
(b) For the purposes of this subtitle, each county and municipal corporation has
all the powers granted in this subtitle to an authority, including the power to make loans
to private enterprises competing with enterprises not receiving the loans.
(c) (1) (i) An authority shall operate and exercise its powers solely to
accomplish one or more of the legislative purposes of this subtitle.
(ii) The incorporating county or municipal corporation may use the
authority’s exercise of its powers to accomplish one or more of the legislative purposes.
(2) An authority or an incorporating county or municipal corporation may
exercise its powers regardless of any effect on economic competition.
(3) The powers granted to a county or municipal corporation under
paragraph (2) of this subsection do not:
(i) grant to the county or municipal corporation powers in any
substantive area not otherwise granted to the county or municipal corporation under other
public general or public local law;
(ii) restrict the county or municipal corporation from exercising any
power granted to the county or municipal corporation under other public general or public
local law or otherwise;
(iii) authorize the county or municipal corporation, or the officers of
the county or municipal corporation, to engage in an activity that is beyond the power
granted under other public general or public local law or otherwise; or
(iv) preempt or supersede the regulatory authority of a unit of State
government under a public general law.
(4) The incorporating county or municipal corporation is not precluded
from directly exercising the powers granted to an authority under this subtitle after the
establishment of the authority.
12–110.
(a) Notwithstanding any limitation of law, a public body may issue and sell bonds
periodically to accomplish the legislative purposes of this subtitle.
(b) (1) A public body may issue and sell bonds [to]:

HOUSE BILL 97 11
(i) subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, TO finance the costs
of the acquisition or improvement of a facility for a facility user, including working capital;
(ii) TO refund outstanding bonds;
(iii) TO pay the costs of preparing, printing, selling, and issuing the
bonds;
(iv) TO fund reserves; [and]
(v) TO pay the interest on the bonds in the amount and for the period
the public body considers reasonable; AND
(VI) FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE IN THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) (i) A public body may not issue bonds to acquire working capital
unless the bonds are secured by a letter of credit or an interest in property.
(ii) Working capital acquired by issuing bonds may not exceed 25%
of the principal amount of the bonds.
12–111.
(a) For each issue of its bonds, the legislative body of a county or municipal
corporation, the board of directors of an authority, or the Maryland Industrial Development
Financing Authority, shall adopt a resolution that:
(1) specifies and describes the facility OR OTHER PROPOSED
UNDERTAKING TO BE FINANCED WITH THE PROCEEDS OF BONDS;
(2) generally describes the public purpose to be served and the financing
transaction;
(3) specifies the maximum principal amount of the bonds that may be
issued; and
(4) imposes terms or conditions on the issuance and sale of bonds it
considers appropriate.
12–113.
(a) (1) A bond and the interest on a bond are limited obligations of the public
body.

HOUSE BILL 97
(2) Except for bond anticipation notes and notes in the nature of
commercial paper, the principal of, premium, and interest on a bond are payable solely
from:
(i) money from the financing of a facility;
(II) AUTHORITY FUNDS OF THE AUTHORITY ISSUING THE
BONDS; or
[(ii)] (III) other money made available to the public body.
(3) Bonds and the interest on them:
(i) are not debts or charges against the general credit or taxing
powers of a public body within the meaning of any constitutional or charter provision or
statutory limitation; and
(ii) may not give rise to any pecuniary liability of an issuing public
body.
(4) A bond may state on its face that the bond:
(i) is issued under this subtitle; and
(ii) is not a debt to which the public body’s faith and credit is pledged.
12–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(D–1) “AUTHORITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS TITLE.
(D–2) “AUTHORITY FUNDS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 12–101 OF THIS
TITLE.
(e) “Bond” means a revenue bond, note, or other similar instrument issued in
accordance with this subtitle by:
(1) a political subdivision;
(2) AN AUTHORITY; or
[(2)] (3) the revenue authority of Prince George’s County.

HOUSE BILL 97 13
(f) “Chief executive” means the president, chair, mayor, or other chief executive
officer of a political subdivision, AN AUTHORITY, or the revenue authority of Prince
George’s County.
(j) “Issuer” means AN AUTHORITY, a political subdivision, or the revenue
authority of Prince George’s County that issues a bond under this subtitle.
12–203.
(a) Before [issuing] bonds ARE ISSUED, the governing body of the political
subdivision shall:
(1) by resolution:
(i) designate a contiguous area within its jurisdiction as a
development district;
(ii) identify an area that has been designated a sustainable
community; or
(iii) identify an area that has been designated a RISE zone;
(2) receive from the Supervisor of Assessments a certification of the
amount of the original base, or if applicable, the adjusted assessable base; and
(3) pledge that until the bonds are fully paid, or a longer period, the real
property taxes in the development district, a RISE zone, or a sustainable community shall
be divided as follows:
(i) the portion of the taxes that would be produced at the current tax
rate on the original taxable value base shall be paid to the respective taxing authorities in
the same manner as taxes on other property are paid; and
(ii) the portion of the taxes on the tax increment that normally would
be paid into the general fund of the political subdivision shall be paid into the special fund
established under § 12–208 of this subtitle and applied in accordance with § 12–209 of this
subtitle.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “brownfields site” has the meaning stated in § 5–301
of this article.
(2) Before [issuing] bonds ARE ISSUED and as part of the resolution
required under subsection (a) of this section, the governing body of the political subdivision
may determine the original base of a brownfields site in a sustainable community.
(3) The determination of the original base of a brownfields site under this
section:

HOUSE BILL 97
(i) is not a determination of the value of the brownfields site; and
(ii) may not be used to determine a property tax assessment or
appeal of a property tax assessment under the Tax – Property Article.
(c) The establishment or identification by a county of a development district, a
RISE zone, or a sustainable community that is wholly or partly in a municipal corporation
shall also require a resolution approving the development district, RISE zone, or
sustainable community by the governing body of the municipal corporation.
12–204.
(a) Notwithstanding any limitation of law, an issuer may issue bonds from time
to time to finance the development of an industrial, commercial, or residential area.
(b) To issue bonds under this subtitle, the governing body of a political subdivision
shall adopt an ordinance that:
(1) describes the proposed undertaking; and
(2) states:
(i) that the governing body has complied with §§ 12–203 and
12–208(c) and (d) of this subtitle;
(ii) the maximum principal amount of the bonds; and
(iii) the maximum rate of interest on the bonds.
(c) The ordinance may specify the following for bonds issued to carry out the
financing of the proposed undertaking:
(1) the principal amount;
(2) the rate of interest;
(3) the manner and terms of sale;
(4) the time of execution, issuance, and delivery;
(5) the form and denomination;
(6) the manner in which, and the times and places at which principal and
interest shall be paid;
(7) conditions for redemption before maturity; or

HOUSE BILL 97 15
(8) other provisions consistent with this subtitle that the governing body of
the political subdivision determines are necessary or desirable.
(d) (1) The revenue authority of Prince George’s County may issue bonds in
accordance with an ordinance adopted by the governing body of Prince George’s County.
(2) AN AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE BONDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN
ORDINANCE ADOPTED BY THE GOVERNING BODY THAT CREATED THE AUTHORITY
UNDER SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE.
(e) The ordinance may specify the items listed in subsection (c) of this section or
may authorize:
(1) the finance board to specify those items by resolution or ordinance; or
(2) the chief executive to specify those items by executive order.
(f) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, neither an
ordinance authorizing the bonds nor an ordinance, resolution, or executive order issued,
passed, or adopted under this section may be subject to referendum because of any other
State or local law.
(2) An ordinance that authorizes the pledge of the full faith and credit of a
political subdivision to the payment of principal and interest on a bond is subject to any
applicable right to referendum.
12–207.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e) of this section, THE SPECIAL
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–208 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR bond proceeds may be used
[only]:
(1) to buy, lease, condemn, or otherwise acquire property, or an interest in
property:
(i) in the development district, a RISE zone, or a sustainable
community; or
(ii) needed for a right–of–way or other easement to or from the
development district, a RISE zone, or a sustainable community;
(2) for site removal;
(3) for surveys and studies;

HOUSE BILL 97
(4) to relocate businesses or residents;
(5) to install utilities, construct parks and playgrounds, and for other
needed improvements including:
(i) roads to, from, or in the development district;
(ii) parking AND ANCILLARY IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO
VEHICLES; and
(iii) lighting;
(6) to construct or rehabilitate buildings for a governmental purpose or use;
(7) for reserves [or], capitalized interest, AND WORKING CAPITAL;
(8) for necessary costs to issue bonds; [and]
(9) to pay the principal of and interest on loans, advances, or indebtedness
that a political subdivision incurs for a purpose specified in this section;
(10) FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENCOURAGING DEVELOPMENT IN THE
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT, A RISE ZONE, OR A SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITY, TO
INSTALL PUBLIC OR PRIVATE INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING:
(I) STREETS;
(II) UTILITIES;
(III) STREET LIGHTS;
(IV) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT AND STORM DRAIN
FACILITIES;
(V) FENCING;
(VI) NOISE WALLS;
(VII) RETAINING WALLS;
(VIII) TRAILS;
(IX) SIDEWALKS;
(X) PUBLIC RECREATIONAL FACILITIES;

HOUSE BILL 97 17
(XI) LANDSCAPING, STREETSCAPING, AND PUBLIC ART; AND
(XII) PEDESTRIAN AND VEHICULAR BRIDGES;
(11) TO ISSUE LOANS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENCOURAGING
DEVELOPMENT IN THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT, RISE ZONE, OR SUSTAINABLE
COMMUNITY;
(12) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE OVERHEAD, LEGAL, OR OTHER OPERATING
EXPENSES OF THE AUTHORITY, INCLUDING THE FEES AND EXPENSES OF
CONSULTANTS;
(13) TO FINANCE OR REFINANCE IN WHOLE OR IN PART:
(I) DEVELOPMENT COSTS OF A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT,
INCLUDING ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION;
(II) IF THE EXPENDITURES ARE RELATED TO HOUSING IN A
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT:
1. THE ACQUISITION OF THE LAND; AND
2. THE COST OF INSTALLATION, CONSTRUCTION, OR
REHABILITATION OF THE HOUSING–RELATED BUILDING, FACILITY, STRUCTURE, OR
OTHER HOUSING IMPROVEMENT, INCLUDING INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS
RELATED TO HOUSING; AND
(III) IF THE EXPENDITURES ARE RELATED TO HOUSING NOT IN A
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT:
1. REPLACING HOUSING UNITS LOST IN A DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT;
2. INCREASING, IMPROVING, OR PRESERVING THE
SUPPLY OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING WITHIN THE BOUNDARY OF THE DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT; OR
3. RELOCATING MOBILE HOME PARK RESIDENTS
DISPLACED BY DEVELOPMENT INSIDE OR OUTSIDE A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;

HOUSE BILL 97
(14) FOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING OR HOMELESS ASSISTANCE, TO LEND,
GRANT, OR CONTRIBUTE FUNDS TO A PERSON, PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ENTITY,
HOUSING AUTHORITY, OR NONPROFIT ENTITY;
(15) FOR AN INCENTIVE OR OTHER CONSIDERATION PAID WITH
RESPECT TO THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(16) FOR THE ACQUISITION OF LAND AND THE COST OF THE
INSTALLATION AND CONSTRUCTION OF ANY PUBLICLY OWNED BUILDING, FACILITY,
STRUCTURE, OR OTHER IMPROVEMENT WITHIN THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(17) BY AN AUTHORITY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
SUBTITLE 1 OF THIS TITLE;
(18) IF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–106 OF
THIS TITLE AND THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION THAT DESIGNATED THE
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT ADOPT A RESOLUTION THAT THE PUBLICLY OWNED
INFRASTRUCTURE AND IMPROVEMENTS BENEFIT THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT,
FOR THE INFRASTRUCTURE AND IMPROVEMENTS OUTSIDE THE DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT;
(19) IF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–106 OF
THIS TITLE AND THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION THAT DESIGNATED THE
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT APPROVE AND PROJECTED AUTHORITY FUNDS ARE
SUFFICIENT TO REPAY THE LOAN, TO MAKE LOANS FROM ONE DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT TO ANOTHER;
(20) AS A GRANT TO THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TO OFFSET THE
TAXES PAID TO THE SPECIAL FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–208 OF THIS
SUBTITLE THAT WERE PAID TO THE AUTHORITY FOR THE PURPOSES UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE;
(21) (I) FOR CONVENTION, CONFERENCE, OR VISITOR CENTERS;
AND
(II) TO MAINTAIN INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND
CONVENTION, CONFERENCE, OR VISITOR CENTERS; AND
(22) FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
12–211.

HOUSE BILL 97 19
(a) The principal amount of bonds, interest payable on bonds, the transfer of
bonds, and income from bonds, including profit made in the sale or transfer of bonds, are
exempt from State and local taxes.
(b) If a political subdivision OR AN AUTHORITY leases as a lessor its property
within a development district, a RISE zone, or a sustainable community:
(1) the property shall be assessed and taxed in the same manner as
privately owned property; and
(2) the lease shall require the lessee to pay taxes or payments in lieu of
taxes on the assessed value of the entire property and not only on the assessed value of the
leasehold interest.
12–212.
This subtitle does not authorize AN AUTHORITY, a county, or a municipal
corporation to acquire property by eminent domain.
The Charter of Baltimore City
Article II – General Powers
The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore shall have full power and authority to
exercise all of the powers heretofore or hereafter granted to it by the Constitution of
Maryland or by any Public General or Public Local Laws of the State of Maryland; and in
particular, without limitation upon the foregoing, shall have power by ordinance, or such
other method as may be provided for in its Charter, subject to the provisions of said
Constitution and Public General Laws:
(62)
(a) (1) To borrow money by issuing and selling bonds, at any time and from
time to time, for the purpose of financing and refinancing the development of an industrial,
commercial, or residential area in Baltimore City. Such bonds shall be payable from and
secured by a pledge of the special fund described in subsection (d)(3)(ii) of this section and
the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore may also establish sinking funds, establish debt
service reserve funds, or pledge other assets and revenues towards the payments of the
principal and interest OR OTHER PURPOSES AS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION,
including revenues received by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore pursuant to a
development agreement.
(2) (i) In lieu of the pledges set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection,
the authorizing ordinance or trust agreement, subject to subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, may pledge or assign:

HOUSE BILL 97
1. all or any part of that portion of the revenues and receipts
from the taxes representing the levy of the tax increment that would normally be paid to
the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore to the payment of such principal and interest;
2. the special fund described in subsection (d)(3)(ii) of this
section and any other fund into which all or any part of such revenues and receipts are
deposited after such revenues and receipts are appropriated by the Mayor and City Council
of Baltimore to the payment of such principal and interest;
3. amounts provided to the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore by the State under § 2–222 of the Tax – Property Article of the Annotated Code
of Maryland; and
4. any other assets and revenues of the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore.
(ii) The revenues and receipts may not be irrevocably pledged to the
payment of such principal and interest and the obligation to pay such principal and interest
from such revenues and receipts shall be subject to annual appropriation by the Mayor and
City Council of Baltimore.
(iii) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore may not pledge its full
faith and credit or unlimited taxing power to the payment of such bonds.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated, unless
the context clearly indicates another or different meaning or intent:
(7) “AUTHORITY” HAS THE MEANING PROVIDED IN § 12–101 OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE OF THE ANNOTATED CODE OF MARYLAND.
[(7)] (8) “Bonds” or “bond” means any bonds or bond, notes or note, or
other similar instruments or instrument issued by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore
OR AN AUTHORITY pursuant to and in accordance with this section.
[(8)] (9) “Development” includes new development, redevelopment,
revitalization, and renovation.
[(9)] (10) “Development agreement” means an agreement between the
Mayor and City Council of Baltimore OR AN AUTHORITY and any person involved in or
responsible for development of property within a development district pursuant to which
such person shall agree to pay in each year in which any bonds are outstanding an amount
equal to all or a portion of the debt service on bonds issued pursuant to this section to
finance or refinance development in such development district.
[(10)] (11) “Development district” means an area or areas within the City of
Baltimore designated by an ordinance of the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore.

HOUSE BILL 97 21
[(11)] (12) “Distressed property” has the meaning stated in § 21–17(a) of the
Public Local Laws of Baltimore City.
[(12)] (13) “Original assessable base” means the assessable base as of
January 1 of that year preceding the effective date of the ordinance creating the
development district under subsection (d) of this section.
[(13)] (14) “Original full cash value” means the dollar amount which is
determined by dividing the original assessable base by the assessment ratio used to
determine the original assessable base.
[(14)] (15) “Original taxable value” means for any tax year the dollar
amount that is the lesser of:
(i) the product of the original full cash value times the assessment
ratio applicable to that tax year;
(ii) the original assessable base; or
(iii) if an adjusted assessable base applies, then the “original taxable
value” is the adjusted assessable base.
[(15)] (16) “Supervisor of Assessments” means the Supervisor of
Assessments for Baltimore City.
[(16)] (17) “Tax increment” means for any tax year the amount by which the
assessable base as of January 1 preceding that tax year exceeds the original taxable value,
divided by the assessment ratio used to determine the original taxable value.
[(17)] (18) “Tax year” means the period from July 1 of a calendar year
through June 30 of the next calendar year.
[(18)] (19) “State obligations” means any bonds or bond, notes or note, or
other similar instruments or instrument issued by the Maryland Economic Development
Corporation, the State of Maryland, or any agency, department, or political subdivision
thereof, the proceeds of which have been used for any of the purposes specified in subsection
(c) of this section.
(B–1) AN AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE BONDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH AN
ORDINANCE ADOPTED BY THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE UNDER
THIS SECTION.
(c) All proceeds received from any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this section
[shall], REVENUE FROM PROPERTY TAXES LEVIED ON A TAX INCREMENT, AND

HOUSE BILL 97
PROPERTY TAXES ALLOCATED TO THE SPECIAL FUND UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(3)(II)
OF THIS SECTION MAY be applied [solely] for:
(1) the cost of purchasing, leasing, condemning, or otherwise acquiring
land or other property, or an interest in them, in the designated development district area
or as necessary for a right–of–way or other easement to or from the development district
area;
(2) site removal;
(3) surveys and studies;
(4) relocation of businesses or residents;
(5) installation of utilities, construction of parks and playgrounds, and
other necessary improvements including streets and roads to, from, or within the
development district, lighting, and other facilities;
(6) construction or rehabilitation of buildings provided that such buildings:
(i) are to be devoted to a governmental use or purpose;
(ii) are abandoned property;
(iii) are distressed property; or
(iv) will provide units of affordable housing;
(7) reserves, WORKING CAPITAL, and capitalized interest on the bonds;
(8) necessary costs of issuing bonds;
(9) structured and surface parking facilities AND ANCILLARY
IMPROVEMENTS RELATED TO VEHICLES that are:
(i) publicly owned; or
(ii) privately owned but serve a public purpose; [and]
(10) payment of the principal and interest on loans, money advanced, or
indebtedness incurred by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore for any of the purposes
set out in this section;
(11) THE PURPOSE OF ENCOURAGING DEVELOPMENT IN THE
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT, A RISE ZONE, OR A SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITY, TO
INSTALL PUBLIC OR PRIVATE INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 97 23
(I) STREETS;
(II) UTILITIES;
(III) STREET LIGHTS;
(IV) STORMWATER MANAGEMENT AND STORM DRAIN
FACILITIES;
(V) FENCING;
(VI) NOISE WALLS;
(VII) RETAINING WALLS;
(VIII) TRAILS;
(IX) SIDEWALKS;
(X) PUBLIC RECREATIONAL FACILITIES;
(XI) LANDSCAPING, STREETSCAPING, AND PUBLIC ART; AND
(XII) PEDESTRIAN AND VEHICULAR BRIDGES;
(12) ISSUING LOANS FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENCOURAGING
DEVELOPMENT IN THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT, RISE ZONE, OR SUSTAINABLE
COMMUNITY;
(13) ADMINISTRATIVE OVERHEAD, LEGAL, OR OTHER OPERATING
EXPENSES OF AN AUTHORITY, INCLUDING THE FEES AND EXPENSES OF
CONSULTANTS;
(14) FINANCING OR REFINANCING ALL OR PART OF:
(I) DEVELOPMENT COSTS OF A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT,
INCLUDING ENVIRONMENTAL REMEDIATION;
(II) IF THE EXPENDITURES ARE RELATED TO HOUSING IN A
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT:
1. THE ACQUISITION OF THE LAND; AND

HOUSE BILL 97
2. THE COST OF INSTALLATION, CONSTRUCTION, OR
REHABILITATION OF THE HOUSING–RELATED BUILDING, FACILITY, STRUCTURE, OR
OTHER HOUSING IMPROVEMENT, INCLUDING INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS
RELATED TO HOUSING; AND
(III) IF THE EXPENDITURES ARE RELATED TO HOUSING NOT IN A
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT:
1. REPLACING HOUSING UNITS LOST IN A DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT;
2. INCREASING, IMPROVING, OR PRESERVING THE
SUPPLY OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING WITHIN THE BOUNDARY OF THE DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT; OR
3. RELOCATING MOBILE HOME PARK RESIDENTS
DISPLACED BY DEVELOPMENT INSIDE OR OUTSIDE A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(15) AFFORDABLE HOUSING OR HOMELESS ASSISTANCE, TO LEND,
GRANT, OR CONTRIBUTE FUNDS TO A PERSON, PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ENTITY,
HOUSING AUTHORITY, OR NONPROFIT ENTITY;
(16) AN INCENTIVE OR OTHER CONSIDERATION PAID WITH RESPECT
TO A DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(17) THE ACQUISITION OF LAND AND THE COST OF THE INSTALLATION
AND CONSTRUCTION OF ANY PUBLICLY OWNED BUILDING, FACILITY, STRUCTURE,
OR OTHER IMPROVEMENT WITHIN THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(18) IF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–106 OF
THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE OF THE ANNOTATED CODE OF MARYLAND
AND THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE ADOPT A RESOLUTION THAT
THE PUBLICLY OWNED INFRASTRUCTURE AND IMPROVEMENTS BENEFIT THE
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT, THE INFRASTRUCTURE AND IMPROVEMENTS OUTSIDE
THE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT;
(19) IF THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–106 OF
THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE OF THE ANNOTATED CODE OF MARYLAND
AND THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE APPROVE AND PROJECTED
AUTHORITY FUNDS ARE SUFFICIENT TO REPAY THE LOAN, MAKING LOANS FROM
ONE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT TO ANOTHER;

HOUSE BILL 97 25
(20) A GRANT TO THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE TO
OFFSET THE REVENUES FROM PROPERTY TAXES LEVIED ON A TAX INCREMENT THAT
WAS PAID TO THE AUTHORITY FOR THE PURPOSES UNDER THIS SECTION;
(21) (I) CONVENTION, CONFERENCE, OR VISITOR CENTERS; AND
(II) MAINTAINING INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND
CONVENTION, CONFERENCE, OR VISITOR CENTERS; AND
(22) ANY OTHER PURPOSE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION OR
TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE OF THE
ANNOTATED CODE OF MARYLAND.
(d) Before [issuing] any bonds ARE ISSUED under this section, the Mayor and
City Council of Baltimore shall:
(1) designate by ordinance an area or areas within the City of Baltimore as
a “development district”;
(2) receive from the Supervisor of Assessments a certification as to the
amount of the original assessable base, or if applicable, the adjusted assessable base; and
(3) provide that until the bonds have been fully paid or thereafter, the
property taxes on real property within the development district shall be divided as follows:
(i) that portion of the taxes which would be produced by the rate at
which taxes levied each year by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore upon the original
taxable value shall be allocated to and when collected paid into the funds of the Mayor and
City Council of Baltimore in the same manner as taxes by the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore on all other property are paid; and
(ii) that portion of the taxes representing the levy on the tax
increment that would normally be paid to the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore shall
be paid into a special fund to be applied in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e)
of this section. This yield shall not be considered as municipal taxes for the purposes of any
constant yield tax limitation or State or local restriction. No State real property taxes may
be paid into the special fund.
(e) (1) The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore may enact an ordinance
creating a special fund described in subsection (d)(3)(ii) of this section with respect to a
development district, even though no bonds authorized by this section have been issued by
the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore OR AN AUTHORITY with respect to that
development district or are then outstanding. The taxes allocated to such special fund by
subsection (d)(3)(ii) of this section shall thereafter be paid over to such special fund, as long
as such ordinance remains in effect.

HOUSE BILL 97
(2) When no bonds authorized by this section are outstanding with respect
to a development district and the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore by ordinance so
determines, moneys in the special fund for that development district created pursuant to
subsection (d)(3)(ii) of this section may be:
(i) used for any of the purposes described in subsection (c) of this
section;
(ii) accumulated for payment of debt service on bonds subsequently
issued under this section;
(iii) used to pay or to reimburse the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore for debt service which the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore is obligated to
pay or has paid (whether such obligation is general or limited) on any bonds or State
obligations; or
(iv) paid to the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore to provide funds
to be used for any legal purpose as may be determined by the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore OR AUTHORITY.
(3) When any bonds authorized by this section are outstanding with
respect to a development district and the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore so
determines, moneys in the special fund for that development district created pursuant to
subsection (d)(3)(ii) of this section may be used as provided in paragraph (2) of this
subsection in any fiscal year by the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore, but only to the
extent that:
(i) the amount in such special fund exceeds the unpaid debt service
payable on such bonds in such fiscal year and is not restricted so as to prohibit the use of
such moneys; and
(ii) such use is not prohibited by the ordinance of the Mayor and City
Council of Baltimore or resolution of the Board of Finance authorizing the issuance of such
bonds.
(f) (1) Before [issuing] any bonds ARE ISSUED under this section the Mayor
and City Council of Baltimore shall enact an ordinance which:
(i) specifies and describes the proposed undertaking and states that
it has complied with subsection (d) of this section; and
(ii) specifies the maximum principal amount of bonds to be issued,
from time to time or at any time, pursuant to such ordinance.
(h) (2) All bonds shall be signed manually or in facsimile by the Mayor of the
City of Baltimore OR THE AUTHORITY, and the seal of the Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore shall be impressed thereon manually or by facsimile and attested by the

HOUSE BILL 97 27
custodian of the City seal, manually or by facsimile. If any officer whose signature or
countersignature appears on the bonds ceases to be such officer before delivery of the bonds,
his signature or countersignature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes
the same as if he had remained in office until delivery thereof.
(j) Whenever the Mayor and City Council of Baltimore OR THE AUTHORITY, as
lessor, leases its property within the development district, the property shall be assessed
and taxed in the same manner as privately owned property, and the lease or contract shall
provide that the lessee shall pay taxes or payments in lieu of taxes upon the assessed value
of the entire property and not merely the assessed value of the leasehold interest.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.